New York, session 2025-2026, A4130.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 155.35 of the penal law, as added 2 by section 5 of part O of chapter 56 of the laws of 2024, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 3. when such person commits deed theft of one commercial real proper- 5 ty, regardless of the value[.], or 6 § 2. Section 155.35 of the penal law, as amended by section 5 of part 7 O of chapter 56 of the laws of 2024, is amended by adding two new subdi- 8 visions 4 and 5 to read as follows: 9 4. the property, regardless of its nature and value, is taken from the 10 person of another and the victim is sixty-five years of age or older, or 11 5. the property, regardless of its nature and value, is obtained by 12 extortion as defined in subparagraphs (iii), (iv), (v), (vi), (vii) and 13 (ix) of paragraph (e) of subdivision two of section 155.05 of this chap- 14 ter and the victim is sixty-five years of age or older. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 16 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03638-01-5